Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Subchapter 1. Generally

§ 271.
Common law adopted.

So much of the common law of England as is applicable to the local situation and circumstances and is not repugnant to the constitution or laws shall be laws in this State and courts shall take notice thereof and govern themselves accordingly.

§ 272.
Equality of privilege.

In cases proper for the cognizance of the civil authority and the courts of judicature in this State, citizens of the United States shall be equally entitled to the privileges of law and justice with citizens of this State.

§ 273.
Eligibility to hold office.

A person shall not be debarred on account of sex from holding any office or position of trust or responsibility under the State, including U.S. Senator and Representative to Congress or any county, town, city, village, town school district, or incorporated fire, lighting, or school district office.